Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-104
Clerk and reporter.

The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall act as the clerk of the Court of Impeachment, and the court may appoint a shorthand reporter, and such officers shall each receive such an allowance as the Court of Impeachment may authorize, to be by them reported for the consideration of the Legislature at its next session.

Laws 1879, § 4, p. 82;

R.S.1913, § 1131;

C.S.1922, § 1060;

C.S.1929, § 27-104;

R.S.1943, § 24-104.